Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 51-3-39.
Construction, modification, and inspection of dams and reservoirs.

Any person proposing to construct, enlarge, repair or alter a dam or reservoir in this state except as provided elsewhere in this section, before proceeding with the construction thereof, must obtain written authorization from the board. Applications shall be made on forms provided by the board, and detailed plans shall be required when deemed necessary by the board in order to determine whether the proposed construction will provide adequate safety for downstream lives and property, and will not adversely affect downstream water rights or plans for the proper utilization of the water resources of the state. Provided further, that:

Written construction authorization shall not be required for any dam or barrier to impound water which (i) is a peripheral dam or barrier of eight (8) feet or less in height, measured from the point of lowest elevation of the toe of the dam or barrier, regardless of impounded storage volume, (ii) impounds twenty-five (25) acre-feet or less at maximum storage volume, or (iii) which does not impound a watercourse with a continuous flow of water.

Any person who seeks to build and maintain a dam on any watercourse lying in whole or in part within a levee district duly constituted under the laws of this state shall first obtain permission from the levee board of such levee district.

Any person intending to acquire the right to store or use water from a reservoir formed by a dam on a watercourse regardless of whether or not written construction authorization therefor was required under this section, may do so only by making an application for a permit as provided elsewhere in this chapter.

The board may request other agencies, or contract with consultants, to recommend land treatment or facilities necessary to prevent pollution of the waters of this state, or to protect the safety and general welfare of the people, and in the board’s discretion, may require that these recommendations be followed before authorization to construct or modify the dam is issued, or order the removal of the dam after it has been constructed or request the commission to order the removal of the dam after it has been constructed or modified when such recommendations are not followed.

The board and commission shall be authorized to make inspections of dams and reservoirs, regardless of whether or not written construction authorization therefor was required under this section, for the purpose of determining their safety, and shall require owners to perform at their expense such work as may be necessary for maintenance and operation which will safeguard life and property. Provided, however, a dam or reservoir may be exempt from inspections when the commission determines that the location, size or condition is such that lives and property will not be endangered. In carrying out the provisions of this section, the board and commission are authorized to expend available state funds, to receive funds from federal agencies, to contract with consultants and/or other agencies, and the commission may issue orders to owners of dams or reservoirs found to be unsafe requiring them to take the prescribed remedial action to safeguard downstream lives and property.

No dam or reservoir, regardless of whether or not written construction authorization therefor is required under this section, may be constructed in such a manner as to impair the common law or other lawful rights of water users below or plans for the proper utilization of the water resources of the state. The board is authorized to prescribe such minimum flow releases from any dam or reservoir as may be found necessary to protect downstream users or otherwise prudently manage available surface water.

When the board or commission finds a dam or reservoir constructed or modified in violation of this chapter or that the owner of a dam or reservoir has allowed the structure to deteriorate and remain in an unsafe condition after having been ordered to make the necessary repairs, then the commission may cause the structure to be removed and/or the board may revoke or modify any other authorization pertaining thereto.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed as creating any liability for damages against the state and/or against its officers, agents and employees.

The provisions of this section shall apply also to a county board of supervisors when constructing dams or low-water control structures on lakes or bodies of water in accordance with the provisions of Section 19-5-92.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-20; Laws, 1956, ch. 167, § 20; Laws, 1978, ch. 437, § 3; Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 21; Laws, 2001, ch. 476, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2001.).

§ 51-3-40.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 22, eff from and after April 1, 1985.

[En Laws, 1978, ch. 437, § 5]

§ 51-3-41.
Compacts and agreements.

The commission shall have authority to negotiate and recommend to the Legislature compacts and agreements concerning this state’s share of ground water and waters flowing in watercourses where a portion of those waters are contained within the territorial limits of a neighboring state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-21; Laws, 1956, ch. 167, § 21; Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 23; Laws, 1995, ch. 505, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 51-3-43.
Right of entry upon public or private lands.

Any member of the board, the commission or any person authorized by either shall have the right to enter upon private or public lands for the purpose of inspecting waterworks, making surveys or conducting tests or examinations necessary for the gathering of information on water resources or uses, subject to responsibility for any damage done to property entered.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-22; Laws, 1956, ch. 167, § 22; Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1985).

§ 51-3-44.
Disclosure; confidentiality claim; violation, penalty.

No person may be required to disclose any trade secret, including any formula, process or methods used in any manufacturing operation or any confidential information concerning business activities.

The provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act shall govern any request to have the commission declare information confidential, subject to specific provisions of this section.

No confidentiality claim or determination of confidentiality shall prevent disclosure of the information to authorized department or federal employees.

Information submitted to the commission containing any trade secret, including any formula, process or methods used in any manufacturing operation or any confidential information concerning business activities, specifically identified as confidential by the applicant and which is not essential for any public review as determined by the commission, shall be kept confidential by the department if:

A written confidentiality claim is made when the information is supplied; and

The confidentiality claim is determined by the commission, after hearing, to be valid.

If the confidentiality claim is denied, the information will not be released until the party claiming confidentiality has withdrawn its claim or has exhausted its administrative remedies. During the pendency of the proceedings the department shall not in any way use the contested information.

Any public officer or employee who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined a sum not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and dismissed from public office or employment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 505, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 51-3-45.
Changes in approved diversion.

The board may consider, approve, modify at the request of the applicant, or reject applications for permanent or temporary changes in the place of diversion or withdrawal or use of water from those originally approved, subject to the rules and regulations of the board and following the procedure herein established for original application for permit.

Any person who changes or attempts to change the point or place of diversion or withdrawal or use of water, either permanently or temporarily, without first applying to the board in the manner prescribed, shall obtain no right thereby and shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished therefor, in the discretion of the court, not to exceed a fine of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). Each day of such unlawful change shall constitute a separate offense, separately punishable.

Each application for a temporary or permanent change shall be accompanied by a fee of One Dollar ($1.00). All fees received by the board as herein prescribed shall be deposited in the General Fund of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 167, § 23; Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1985).

§ 51-3-47.
Water rights adjudicated by court.

Whenever the rights for the use of waters within the state shall have been adjudicated by any court, the board shall aid in the distribution of water in accordance with the terms of the decree; and it shall be the duty of the clerk of any court in which such decree has been issued, within ten (10) days after such decree shall have been entered, to forward to the board and commission, by registered mail, a certified copy of the decree.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-24; Laws, 1956, ch. 167, § 24; Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 26, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1985).

§ 51-3-49.
Appeal from order of board or commission.

In addition to any other remedies that might now be available, any person or interested party aggrieved by an order of the commission or of the permit board shall have the right to perfect an appeal to the appropriate chancery court in the manner set forth in Sections 49-17-41 and 49-17-29.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-25; Laws, 1956, ch. 167, § 25; Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1985).

§ 51-3-51.
Hearing procedures.

The procedures whereby the commission or an employee thereof may obtain a hearing before the commission on a violation of any provisions of this chapter, including a violation of the terms and conditions of any water permit issued by the board, or of a regulation or of any order of the commission or whereby any interested person may obtain a hearing on matters within the jurisdiction of the commission or a hearing on any order of the commission shall be as prescribed in Sections 49-17-31 through 49-17-41. Further, all proceedings before the permit board shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by Section 49-17-29.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-26; Laws, 1956, ch. 167, § 26; Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1985).

§ 51-3-53.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

[Codes, 1942, § 5956-27; Laws, 1956, ch. 167, § 27]

§ 51-3-55.
Enforcement authority; penalties; injunctive relief.

It shall be the duty of the Commission on Natural Resources to serve as the enforcement agency for the Permit Board when the board determines that the sanctions available to it are not sufficient to achieve compliance with the provisions of this chapter. In such cases the board shall notify the commission of such noncompliance or violation and request that the commission take appropriate action. A member of the commission or an employee of the commission may also make such a request.

Any person who knowingly submits false or inaccurate information in support of a permit application or a notice of claim or who wilfully fails to comply with the conditions of a permit issued by the board or who wilfully violates orders issued by the commission shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) within the discretion of the court. Each day in which such violation exists or continues shall constitute a separate offense.

In addition to or in lieu of filing a criminal complaint, the commission may impose a civil penalty not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each such offense, such penalty to be assessed and levied by the commission after a hearing as provided herein.

Appeals from the imposition of the civil penalty may be taken to the chancery court in the same manner as appeals from orders of the commission. If the appellant desires to stay the execution of a civil penalty assessed by the commission, he shall give bond with sufficient resident sureties of one or more guaranty or surety companies authorized to do business in this state, payable to the State of Mississippi, in an amount equal to double the amount of any civil penalty assessed by the commission, as to which the stay of execution is desired, conditioned, if the judgment shall be affirmed, to pay all costs of the assessment entered against the appellant.

In lieu of, or in addition to, the penalty provided in subsection (3) of this section, the commission shall have power to institute and maintain in the name of the state any and all proceedings necessary or appropriate to enforce the provisions of Sections 51-3-1 through 51-3-55, rules and regulations in force pursuant thereto, and orders and permits issued under those sections, in the appropriate circuit, chancery, county or justice court of the county in which venue may lie. The commission may obtain mandatory or prohibitory injunctive relief, either temporary or permanent, and in cases of imminent and substantial hazard or endangerment to life or property, it shall not be necessary in such cases that the state plead or prove: (a) That irreparable damage would result if the injunction did not issue; (b) that there is no adequate remedy at law; or (c) that a written complaint or commission order has first been issued for the alleged violation.

Commission hearings on the imposition of the above prescribed civil penalty or other sanctions shall be conducted as prescribed in Sections 49-17-31 through 49-17-41.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 437, § 4; Laws, 1985, ch. 459, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1985).